Utah statutes.
41-1a-1003.   Unbranded certificate of title -- Application.
(1)  If the certified vehicle inspector determines under Section 41-1a-1002
that a motor vehicle may qualify for an unbranded title, following repair or
replacement of the damaged major component part of the vehicle identified by
the certified vehicle inspector, the owner may submit an application to the
Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division for issuance of an unbranded title.
(2)  The applicant for an unbranded title shall submit to the Motor Vehicle
Enforcement Division an application together with the vehicle damage
disclosure statement and other supporting documents required by the Motor
Vehicle Enforcement Division.
(3)  The Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division shall make an independent
determination based on the vehicle damage disclosure statement and other
relevant documents whether the motor vehicle is qualified to receive an
unbranded title.
